Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-229
Game birds, defined.

Game birds means coots, cranes, curlew, doves, grouse, partridges, pheasants, plovers, prairie chickens, quail, rails, snipes, swans, woodcocks, wild turkeys, and all migratory waterfowl.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 39;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 7.

Pheasants are game birds. State v. Allen, 159 Neb. 314, 66 N.W.2d 830 (1954).